Utah statutes.
17C-3-402.   Requirements for notice provided by agency.
(1)  The notice required by Section 17C-3-401 shall be given by:
(a) (i)  publishing one notice, excluding the map referred to in Subsection
(3)(b), in a newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the
project area or proposed project area is located, at least 14 days before the
hearing; or
(ii)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation, posting notice in at
least three conspicuous places within the county in which the project area or
proposed project area is located; and
(b)  at least 30 days before the hearing, mailing notice to:
(i)  each record owner of property located within the project area or proposed
project area;
(ii)  the State Tax Commission;
(iii)  the assessor and auditor of the county in which the project area or
proposed project area is located; and
(iv) (A)  each member of the taxing entity committee; or
(B)  if a taxing entity committee has not yet been formed, the State Board of
Education and the legislative body or governing board of each taxing entity.
(2)  The mailing of notice to record property owners required under Subsection
(1)(b)(i) shall be conclusively considered to have been properly completed if:
(a)  the agency mails the notice to the property owners as shown in the
records, including an electronic database, of the county recorder's office and
at the addresses shown in those records; and
(b)  the county recorder's office records used by the agency in identifying
owners to whom the notice is mailed and their addresses were obtained or
accessed from the county recorder's office no earlier than 30 days before the
mailing.
(3)  The agency shall include in each notice required under Section 17C-3-401:
(a) (i)  a specific description of the boundaries of the economic development
project area or proposed project area; or
(ii) (A)  a mailing address or telephone number where a person may request
that a copy of the description be sent at no cost to the person by mail or
facsimile transmission; and
(B)  if the agency has an Internet website, an Internet address where a person
may gain access to an electronic, printable copy of the description;
(b)  a map of the boundaries of the project area or proposed project area;
(c)  an explanation of the purpose of the hearing; and
(d)  a statement of the date, time, and location of the hearing.
(4)  The agency shall include in each notice under Subsections (1)(b)(ii),
(iii), and (iv):
(a)  a statement that property tax revenues resulting from an increase in
valuation of property within the economic development project area or proposed
project area will be paid to the agency for economic development purposes
rather than to the taxing entity to which the tax revenues would otherwise
have been paid if:
(i)  a majority of the taxing entity committee consents to the project area
budget; and
(ii)  the project area plan provides for the agency to receive tax increment;
and
(b)  an invitation to the recipient of the notice to submit to the agency
comments concerning the subject matter of the hearing before the date of the
hearing.
(5)  An agency may include in a notice under Subsection (1) any other
information the agency considers necessary or advisable, including the public
purpose served by the project and any future tax benefits expected to result
from the project.
